Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1351
Unconstitutional.

Pursuant to section 49-705(2)(d) the Revisor of Statutes has omitted sections 77-1349 to 77-1354. These sections passed in 1977 as LB 131. The Supreme Court in State ex rel. Douglas v. Herrington, 206 Neb. 516, 294 N.W.2d 330 (1980) held section 77-1350(1) to be unconstitutional and also held such section was not severable and therefor the whole act was unconstitutional.